Maryland, session 2026, HB0207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
5–304.
(c) On the certificate of candidacy form prescribed by the State Board, the
candidate shall specify:
(1) the office, including, if applicable, the party, district, and circuit to
which the candidacy relates;
(2) the year of the election;
(3) the name of the individual filing the certificate;
(4) the address on the statewide voter registration list or the current
address of that individual;
(5) a statement that the individual satisfies the requirements of law for
candidacy for the office for which the certificate is being filed; and
(6) any information requested by the State Board to verify the accuracy of
the information provided by the individual under this subsection.
(D) (1) THE CERTIFICATE OF CANDIDACY FORM SHALL INCLUDE THE
OPTION FOR A CANDIDATE FOR THE OFFICE OF UNITED STATES SENATOR OR
REPRESENTATIVE IN CONGRESS TO INDICATE THAT, IF ELECTED, THE CANDIDATE
AND THE CANDIDATE’S SPOUSE WILL NOT BUY, SELL, OR EXCHANGE INDIVIDUAL
STOCKS DURING THE CANDIDATE’S TERM OF OFFICE.
(2) IF A CANDIDATE MAKES THE INDICATION DESCRIBED IN
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE STATE BOARD SHALL PUBLISH THAT
INFORMATION ON THE STATE BOARD’S WEBSITE.
[(d)] (E) The certificate of candidacy shall be accompanied by:
(1) a filing fee satisfying the requirements of § 5–401 of this title;
(2) a separate form, unless such a form has previously been filed,
establishing a campaign finance entity under Title 13 of this article;
(3) evidence that the individual has filed:

HOUSE BILL 207 3
(i) a financial disclosure statement with the State Ethics
Commission in accordance with the requirements of Title 5, Subtitle 6 of the General
Provisions Article; or
(ii) any other financial disclosure report required by law; and
(4) any additional information required by the State Board.
[(e)] (F) The appropriate board shall accept the certificate of candidacy if it
determines that all requirements are satisfied.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.